California statutes. Civil Code
(2) The name and address of the new student loan servicer to whom subsequent payments or communications are required to be sent.

(3) The telephone numbers and internet websites of the new student loan servicer.

(4) The effective date of the sale, assignment, or transfer.

(5) The date on which the current student loan servicer will stop accepting payments on the borrower’s student loan.

(6) The date on which the new student loan servicer will begin accepting payments on the borrower’s student loan.

(n) Ensure all necessary information regarding a borrower, a borrower’s account, and a borrower’s student loan accompanies a loan when it transfers to a new student loan servicer within 45 calendar days of the effective date of the sale, assignment, or transfer. For purposes of this subdivision, “necessary information” shall include, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) A schedule of all transactions credited or debited to the student loan account.

(2) A copy of the promissory note for the student loan.

(3) Any notes created by
 the student loan servicer’s personnel reflecting communications with the borrower about the student loan account.

(4) A report of the data fields relating to the borrower’s student loan account created by the student loan servicer’s electronic systems in connection with servicing practices.

(5) Copies or electronic records of any information or documents provided by the borrower to the student loan servicer.

(6) Usable data fields with information necessary to assess qualification for forgiveness, including public service loan forgiveness, if applicable.

(7) Any information necessary to compile a payment history.

(o) Provide specialized training for
 any customer service personnel that advises military borrowers about student loan repayment benefits and protections.

(p) Provide specialized training for any customer service personnel that advises borrowers working in public service about student loan repayment benefits and protections.

(q) Provide specialized training for any customer service personnel that advises older borrowers about risks specifically applicable to older borrowers to ensure that, once identified, older borrowers are informed about student loan repayment benefits and protections, including disability discharge programs for private and federal loans, if applicable, and, to the extent an older borrower serves as cosigner, about cosigner release provisions in private student loan contracts.

(r) Provide specialized training for any customer service
 personnel that advises borrowers with disabilities about student loan repayment benefits and protections, including disability discharge programs for private and federal loans. Under no circumstances shall a person engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any borrower with a disability or misrepresent or omit any material information in connection with the servicing of a student loan owed by a borrower with a disability. For purposes of this subdivision, “misrepresent or omit any material information” includes, but is not limited to, misrepresenting or omitting any of the following:

(1) The availability of any program or protection specific to borrowers with disabilities or applicable to those borrowers.

(2) The amount, nature, or terms of any fee or payment due or claimed to be due on a student loan.

(3) The terms and conditions of the student loan agreement.

(4) The borrower’s obligations under the student loan.

(s) Respond within 10 business days to communications from the Student Loan Ombudsman, established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1788.104), or within a shorter, reasonable time as the Student Loan Ombudsman may request in that person’s communication.

(t) (1) Respond to a qualified written request by acknowledging receipt of the request within 10 business days and within 30 business days, provide information relating to the request and, if applicable, either the action the student loan servicer will take to correct the account or an explanation for the position that the borrower’s account is correct.

(2) The 30-day period described in paragraph (1) may be extended for not more than 15 days if, before the end of the 30-day period, the student loan servicer notifies the borrower of the extension and the reason for the delay in responding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 5.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Enforcement of the Student Borrower Bill of Rights [1788.103. - 1788.103.]

1788.103.

(a) A student loan servicer shall do both of the following:

(1) Comply with this title.

(2) Comply with all applicable federal laws relating to student loan servicing, as from time to time amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

(b) Any consumer who suffers damage as a result of the failure of a student loan servicer to comply with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) may, subject to the requirements of subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, bring an action on that consumer’s behalf and on behalf of a similarly situated class of consumers against that student loan servicer to recover or obtain any of the following:

(1) Actual damages, but in no case, shall the total award of damages be less than five hundred dollars ($500) per plaintiff, per violation.

(2) An order enjoining the methods, acts, or practices.

(3) Restitution of property.

(4) Punitive damages.

(5) Attorney’s fees.

(6) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(c) In addition to any other remedies provided by this subdivision or otherwise provided by law, whenever it is proven by a preponderance of the evidence that a student loan servicer has engaged in conduct that substantially interferes with a borrower’s
 right to an alternative payment arrangement; loan forgiveness, cancellation, or discharge; or any other financial benefit as established under the terms of a borrower’s promissory note or under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a et seq.), as from time to time amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, the court shall award treble actual damages to the plaintiff, but in no case shall the award of damages be less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per plaintiff, per violation.

(d) (1) At least 45 days before bringing an action for damages or injunctive relief pursuant to this chapter, a consumer shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide written notice to the person alleged to have violated subdivision (a) regarding the nature of the alleged violations.

(B) Demand that the person correct and remedy the method, acts, or practices to which the notice required by subparagraph (A) refers.

(2) The notice required by this subdivision shall be sent by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the person’s address on file with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation or to the person’s principal place of business within California.

(e) An action for damages or injunctive relief brought by a consumer only on that consumer’s behalf may not be maintained under subdivision (b) upon a showing by a person that an appropriate correction and remedy is given, or agreed to be given within a reasonable time, to the consumer within 30 days after receipt of the notice.

(f) An action for damages brought by a consumer on both the consumer’s
 behalf and on behalf of a similarly situated class of consumers may not be maintained under subdivision (b) upon a showing by a person alleged to have employed or committed methods, acts, or practices declared unlawful that all of the following are true:

(1) All consumers similarly situated have been identified, or a reasonable effort to identify those other consumers has been made.

(2) All consumers so identified have been notified that, upon their request, the person shall make the appropriate correction and remedy.

(3) The correction and remedy requested by the consumers has been, or, in a reasonable time, will be, given.

(4) The person has ceased from engaging, or if immediate cessation is impossible or unreasonably expensive under the
 circumstances, the person will, within a reasonable time, cease to engage, in the methods, act, or practices.

(g) Attempts to comply with a demand described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) by a person receiving that demand shall be construed to be an offer to compromise and shall be inadmissible as evidence pursuant to Section 1152 of the Evidence Code. Furthermore, these attempts to comply with a demand shall not be considered an admission of engaging in an act or practice declared unlawful by subdivision (a). Evidence of compliance or attempts to comply with this section may be introduced by a defendant for the purpose of establishing good faith or to show compliance with subdivision (a).

(h) An award of damages shall not be given in an action based on a method, act, or practice in violation of subdivision (a) if the person alleged to have employed or committed that method,
 act, or practice does both of the following:

(1) Proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the use of reasonable procedures adopted to avoid that error.

(2) Makes an appropriate correction, repair, replacement, or other remedy according to the provisions of subdivisions (d) and (e) as required by law.

(i) The commissioner shall administer and enforce the provisions of this title and may promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders consistent with that authority.

(1) The commissioner shall have the authority to carry over any regulations issued pursuant to the Student Loan Servicing Act in order to implement equivalent provisions of this act.

(2) Any rules issued pursuant to the Student Loan Servicing Act in effect at the time of enactment of this act shall remain in effect until the commissioner repeals or reissues those regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 21.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Establishment of The California Student Loan Ombudsman [1788.104. - 1788.104.]

1788.104.

(a) Not later than 180 days following the operative date of this chapter, the commissioner shall designate a Student Loan Ombudsman to work within the department. The Student Loan Ombudsman shall hire additional staff as necessary to implement this section.

(b) The Student Loan Ombudsman shall receive and review complaints from student loan borrowers.

(c) Any complaint regarding a student loan servicer licensed or subject to licensing under the Student Loan Servicing Act (Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 28100) of the Financial Code) shall be referred to the appropriate unit within the department. This unit may investigate complaints referred by the Student Loan Ombudsman, and from the public,
 who may also submit complaints directly to the department.

(d) Complaints regarding student loans not subject to the Student Loan Servicing Act (Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 28100) of the Financial Code) shall be referred to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may investigate complaints regarding student loans referred by the Student Loan Ombudsman, and from the public, who may also submit complaints directly to the Department of Justice.

(e) Complaints regarding any private postsecondary educational institution licensed by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education shall be referred to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education’s Office of Student Assistance and Relief.

(f) The Student Loan Ombudsman shall confer with the Department of Justice and the Office of Student Assistance
 and Relief regarding the student loan complaints, the proper referral processes for those complaints, and the reporting requirements of the Student Loan Ombudsman under this title.

(g) The Student Loan Ombudsman has all of the following duties:

(1) Compiling and analyzing data on the number of student loan borrower complaints received by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation and referred to the Department of Justice.

(2) Providing information to the public, agencies, legislators, and others regarding the problems and concerns of student loan borrowers and making recommendations for resolving those problems and concerns.

(3) Analyzing and monitoring the development and implementation of federal and state laws, rules, regulations, and
 policies relating to student loan borrowers.

(4) Disseminating information concerning the availability of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Department of Justice, and the Bureau of Private Postsecondary Education to accept complaints from individual student loan borrowers and potential student loan borrowers.

(5) Requesting and compiling information provided by any student loan servicer if reasonably determined by the Student Loan Ombudsman to be necessary to effectuate the duties described in this subdivision, except if that student loan servicer is a national bank, as defined in Section 25b of Title 12 of the United States Code, and only to the extent that the requirements of this paragraph are preempted with respect to national banks pursuant to Section 25b and following of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(6) Not later than 18 months after the operative date of this chapter, and not less frequently than once per year thereafter, the Student Loan Ombudsman shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over higher education and financial institutions. The Student Loan Ombudsman shall report on all of the following:

(A) The implementation of this section.

(B) The types of complaints received regarding student loan borrowing, student loan repayment and servicing, and how these complaints are resolved.

(C) Other data and analysis on outstanding student loan issues faced by borrowers.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of Section 1788.100, for purposes of
 this chapter, “student loan servicer” includes a state or nonprofit private institution or organization having an agreement with the United States Secretary of Education under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1078(b)) in connection with its responsibilities as a guaranty agency engaged in default aversion.

(i) The operation of this chapter is contingent upon the enactment of an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for its purposes.

(j) This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 22.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Shining a Spotlight on Student Loan Industry Practices [1788.105. - 1788.106.]

1788.105.

(a) The commissioner may monitor for risks to consumers in the provision of student loan servicing in this state, including developments in the market for those services, by compiling and analyzing data and other information based on any of the following considerations:

(1) The likely risks and costs to consumers associated with using or repaying a student loan or with the servicing of a student loan.

(2) The understanding by consumers of the risks of a student loan or the servicing of a student loan.

(3) The legal protections applicable to the offering or provision of a student loan or the servicing of a student loan, including the
 extent to which the law is likely to adequately protect consumers.

(4) The rates of growth in the offering or provision of a student loan or the servicing of that loan.

(5) The extent, if any, to which the risks of a student loan or the servicing of a student loan disproportionately affect traditionally underserved consumers.

(6) The type, number, and other pertinent characteristics of student loan servicers in this state.

(b) In conducting any monitoring or assessment authorized by this section, the commissioner may gather information regarding the organization, business conduct, markets, and activities of student loan servicers in this state, except if that student loan servicer is a national bank, as defined in Section 25b of Title 12 of the United
 States Code, and only to the extent that the requirements of this paragraph are preempted with respect to national banks pursuant to Section 25b and following of Title 12 of the United States Code. The commissioner may enter into contracts to perform the duties required in this section, as necessary.

(c) In order to gather information described in subdivision (b), the commissioner may do both of the following:

(1) Gather and compile information from a variety of sources, including consumer complaints, voluntary surveys and voluntary interviews of consumers, surveys and interviews with student loan servicers and service providers, and review of available databases.

(2) Require persons engaged in student loan servicing and licensed or subject to the licensing requirements of the Student Loan Servicing Act (Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 28100) of the Financial Code) to file, under oath or otherwise, in the form and within a reasonable period of time as the commissioner may prescribe, annual or special reports, or answers in writing to specific questions, as necessary for the commissioner to fulfill the monitoring, assessment, and reporting responsibilities required in this title.

(d) (1) In addition to any other market monitoring activities deemed necessary by the commissioner, pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may gather and compile information from student loan servicers to assemble data that assesses the total size of the student loan market in this state, the servicing of loans owed by borrowers at
 risk of default, the servicing of private student loans owed by borrowers experiencing financial distress, and the servicing of federal student loans for borrowers who seek to repay their loans under an Income Driven Repayment Plan as described in Section 1070 et seq. of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) The commissioner may, on a quarterly basis, develop and publicize metrics based on data collected pursuant to this subdivision, and those metrics may identify each student loan servicer and publish relevant metrics related to performance of student loan servicing by each person. In executing the function described in this subdivision, the commissioner may meet and confer with the Student Loan Ombudsman established pursuant to Chapter 4.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of Section 1788.100, for purposes of this chapter, “student loan servicer” includes a state or nonprofit
 private institution or organization having an agreement with the United States Secretary of Education under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1078(b)) in connection with its responsibilities as a guaranty agency engaged in default aversion.

(f) This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(g) The operation of this chapter is contingent upon the enactment of an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 6.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.106.

Any waiver of a provision of this title is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 14.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C.15. Private Student Loan Collections Reform Act [1788.200. - 1788.211.]

1788.200.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Private Student Loan Collections Reform Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.201.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Borrower” or “student loan borrower” means a person who has received or agreed to pay a private education loan.

(b) “Consumer report” and “consumer reporting agency” shall each have the same meaning that these terms have under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(c) (1) “Cosigner” means any individual who is liable for the obligation of another without compensation, regardless of how the individual is designated in the contract or instrument with
 respect
 to that obligation, including an obligation under a private education loan extended to consolidate a borrower’s preexisting private education loans, and shall include any person whose signature is requested as a condition to grant credit or to forbear on collection.

(2) “Cosigner” does not include a spouse of an individual described in paragraph (1), the signature of whom is needed to perfect the security interest in a loan.

(d) “Creditor” means any of the following:

(1) The original creditor, where ownership of a private education loan has not been sold, assigned, or transferred.

(2) The person or entity that owned the private education loan at
 the time the private education loan defaulted, even if that person or entity did not originate the private education loan, and where such a private education loan has not subsequently been sold, transferred, or assigned.

(3) A person or entity that purchased a defaulted private education loan, whether it collects the private education loan itself or hires a third party for collection, or hires an attorney for collection litigation.

(e) “Debtor” means a borrower, cosigner, or other person that owes or is alleged to owe an unpaid amount on a private education loan.

(f) (1) “Exempt entity” means an entity that meets both of the
 following requirements:

(A) It is a depository institution as defined in Section 1420 of the Financial Code.

(B) It, together with its affiliates, will be, in the aggregate, a plaintiff in 35 or fewer private student loan collection actions in the current calendar year. Private education loans assigned to a third party for the purposes of collection shall count towards the numerical limit set forth in this subparagraph.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an entity is an “affiliate” of another specified entity if it directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the other specified entity.

(g) “Original creditor” means the private education lender identified in a promissory note, loan agreement, or loan contract entered into with a student loan borrower or cosigner.

(h) “Private education lender” means either of the following:

(1) Any person or entity engaged in the business of securing, making, or extending private education loans.

(2) Any holder of a private education loan.

(i) “Private education loan” means an extension of credit that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is not made, insured, or guaranteed under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(2) Is extended to a consumer expressly, in whole or in part, for postsecondary educational expenses, regardless of whether the loan is provided by the educational institution that the student attends.

(3) Does not include open-end credit or any loan that is secured
 by real property or a dwelling.

(4) Does not include an extension of credit in which the covered educational institution is the original creditor if either:

(A) The term of the extension of credit is 90 days or less.

(B) An interest rate will not be applied to the credit balance and the term of the extension of credit is one year or less, even if the credit is payable in more than four installments.

(j) “Private education loan collection action” means any suit, arbitration, or other legal proceeding in which a claim is asserted to collect a private education loan.

(k) “Private education loan collector” means a person, other than a private education lender, collecting or attempting to collect on a defaulted private education loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.202.

(a) A private education lender or a private education loan collector shall not make any written statement to a debtor in an attempt to collect a private education loan unless the private education lender or private education loan collector possesses the following information:

(1) The name of the owner of the private education loan.

(2) The creditor’s name at the time of default, if applicable.

(3) The creditor’s account number used to identify the private education loan at the time of default, if the original creditor used an account number to
 identify the private education loan at the time of default.

(4) The amount due at default.

(5) An itemization of interest, if any, that has accrued on the private education loan.

(6) An itemization of fees, if any, claimed to be owed on the private education loan and whether those fees were imposed by the original creditor or any subsequent owners of the private education loan.

(7) The date that the private education loan was incurred.

(8) The date of the first partial payment or the first day that a payment was missed, whichever is earlier, that precipitated default.

(9) The date and amount of the last payment, if applicable.

(10) Any payments, settlement, or financial remuneration of any kind paid to the creditor by a guarantor, surety, or other party not obligated on the loan as compensation under a separate contract that provides coverage for financial losses incurred as a result of default, if applicable.

(11) The names of all persons or entities that owned the private education loan after the time of default, if applicable, and the date of each sale or transfer.

(12) A copy of the self-certification form and any other “needs analysis” conducted by the original creditor prior to origination of the loan.

(13) Documentation establishing that the creditor is the owner of the specific individual private education loan at issue. If the private education loan was assigned more than once, the creditor shall possess each assignment or other writing evidencing the transfer of ownership of the specific individual private education loan to establish an unbroken chain of ownership, beginning with the original creditor to the first subsequent creditor and each additional creditor. Each assignment or other writing evidencing transfer of ownership or the right to collect shall contain the original creditor’s account number (redacted for security purposes to show only the last four
 digits) of the private education loan purchased or otherwise assigned, the date of purchase and assignment, and shall clearly show the borrower’s correct name associated with the original account number. The assignment or other writing attached shall be that by which the creditor or other assignee acquired the private education loan, not a document prepared for litigation.

(14) A copy of all pages of the contract, application, or other documents evidencing the debtor’s liability for the private education loan, stating all terms and conditions applicable to the private education loan.

(15) A list of all
 collection attempts made in the last 12 months, including date and time of all calls and written communications.

(16) A statement as to whether the creditor is willing to renegotiate the terms of the private student loan.

(17) Copies of all written settlement communications made in the last 12 months, or, in the alternative, a statement that the creditor has not attempted to settle or otherwise renegotiate the debt prior to suit.

(18) A statement as to whether the private education loan is eligible for an income-based repayment plan.

(b) (1) In
 addition to any other information required under applicable federal or state law, a private education lender or private education loan collector shall provide the information set forth in subdivision (a) in the first written collection communication with a debtor after the first of either of the following:

 (A) Default and acceleration.

 (B) A period of 12 consecutive months of default.

 (2) A private education lender or private education loan collector shall provide the information set forth in subdivision (a) to the debtor upon the debtor’s request if both of the following are true:

 (A) An event described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) has occurred.

(B) The debtor has not requested or received the information set forth in subdivision (a) within the previous 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.203.

(a) All settlement agreements between a private education lender or private education loan collector and a debtor shall be documented in open court or otherwise reduced to writing. The private education lender or private education loan collector shall ensure that a copy of the written agreement is provided to the debtor.

(b) A private education lender or private education loan collector that accepts a payment as payment in full, or as a full and final compromise of a private education loan, shall provide, within 30 calendar days, a final statement that shall clearly and conspicuously show the amount and date paid, the name of the entity paid, the current
 account number, the name of the private education lender or private education loan collector, the account number issued by the private education lender or private education loan collector, the name of the owner of the private education loan, and that a zero balance is owing. The statement may be provided electronically if the parties agree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.204.

A private education lender or private education loan collector shall not bring suit or initiate an arbitration or other legal proceeding to collect a private education loan if the applicable statute of limitations for the private education lender’s or private education loan collector’s claim has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.205.

In an action brought by a private education lender or private education loan collector to collect a private education loan:

(a) The complaint shall allege all of the following:

(1) The information required by paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1788.202.

(2) That the applicable statute of limitations has not expired.

(3) That the plaintiff has complied with Section 1788.202.

(b) Copies of the documents required
 by paragraphs (12) to (14), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1788.202 shall be attached to the complaint.

(c) The requirements of this title shall not be deemed to require the disclosure in public records of personal, financial, or medical information, the confidentiality of which is protected by any state or federal law. 

(d) This section does not apply to a plaintiff that attaches to the complaint a declaration or affidavit pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure that is signed by a natural person and states all of the following:

(1) That the plaintiff is
 an exempt entity.

(2) The category in subdivision (a) of Section 1420 of the Financial Code under which the plaintiff falls.

(3) The name and title of the signer.

(4) That the signer has been authorized by the entity to make the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.206.

(a) In an action initiated by a private education lender or private education loan collector, no default or other judgment may be entered against a defendant unless documents are submitted by the plaintiff to the court to establish the facts required to be alleged by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1788.205. The documents shall be properly authenticated and each shall
 be in a form that would be admissible as a business record under Section 1271 of the Evidence Code.

(b) In an action initiated by a private education lender or private education loan collector, no default or other judgment may be entered against a defendant unless copies of the documents described in subdivision (b) of Section 1788.205 have been submitted by the plaintiff to the court. These documents shall be properly authenticated and each shall be in a form that would be admissible
 as a business record under Section 1271 of the Evidence Code.

(c) In any action on a private education loan, if a plaintiff seeks a default judgment and has not complied with the requirements of this title, the court shall not enter a default judgment for the plaintiff and may, in its discretion, dismiss the action.

(d) Except as provided in this title, this section is not intended to modify or otherwise amend the procedures established in Section 585 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(e) This section does not apply to a plaintiff that attaches to the complaint a declaration or affidavit pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure that is signed by a natural
 person and states all of the following:

(1) That the plaintiff is an exempt entity.

(2) The category in subdivision (a) of Section 1420 of the Financial Code under which the plaintiff falls.

(3) The name and title of the signer.

(4) That the signer has been authorized by the entity to make the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.207.

Notwithstanding Section 473.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if service of a summons has not resulted in actual notice to a person in time to defend an action brought by a private education lender or a private education loan collector and a default or default judgment has been entered against the person in the action, the person may serve and file a notice of motion and motion to set aside the default or default judgment and for leave to defend the action utilizing the procedures set forth in Section 1788.61.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.208.

(a) A person may bring a cause of action against a creditor, private education lender, or private education loan collector for a violation of any provision of this title in order to recover or obtain any of the following:

(1) Damages in an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(A) Any actual damages sustained by that person as a result of the violation.

(B) Statutory damages in an amount as the court may allow, which shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.

(2) Damages pursuant to Section 3294.

(3) An order vacating any default judgment entered against that person.

(4) Restitution of all moneys taken from or paid by that person after a default judgment was entered in favor of the private education lender or private education loan collector.

(5) An order directing the private education lender or private education loan collector to do one or more of the following:

(A) Request that a consumer reporting agency correct a consumer report that it issues.

(B) Request that a consumer reporting agency remove derogatory information furnished to it after
 default.

(C) Furnish correct information to a consumer reporting agency.

(6) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(b) In the case of a class action, a defendant that violates any provision of this title shall be liable for any statutory damages for each named plaintiff as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If the court finds that the defendant engaged in a pattern and practice of violating any provision of this title, the court may award additional damages to the class in an amount not to exceed the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 1 percent of the net worth of the defendant. 

(c) (1) In the case of any successful cause of action under this section, the court shall award costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing defendant upon a finding by the court that the plaintiff’s prosecution of the cause of action was not in good faith.

(d) A private education lender or private education loan collector shall have no civil liability for damages under this section if the private education lender or private education loan collector shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, and occurred notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any error.

(e) A cause of action to enforce any liability created by this title shall be brought within one year from the date of the discovery by the plaintiff of the last violation, or, in the event a default judgment is entered against the debtor, one year from the date the borrower first receives a writ, notice, or order under Division 1 (commencing with Section 680.010) or Division 2 (commencing with Section 695.010) of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.209.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.210.

The provisions of this title are severable. If any provision of this title or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1788.211.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.211.

This title shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C.17. Fair Debt Settlement Practices  [1788.300. - 1788.307.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1788.300. - 1788.302.]

1788.300.

This title may be cited as the Fair Debt Settlement Practices Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.301.

For purposes of this title:

(a) “Debt settlement provider” means a person who, for compensation and on behalf of a consumer, provides debt settlement services.

(b) “Debt settlement services” means any of the following:
